Wyoming, session 2026, HB0070.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1.

(a) The legislature finds that:

(i) Wyoming has a strong public policy favoring
robust protection of speech, association and innovation,
including in the fields of digital communication,
blockchain and internet services and relies on a
predictable legal environment for persons engaged in those
activities in this state;

(ii) Foreign states and international
organizations increasingly seek to restrict, penalize or
compel disclosure of speech that occurs wholly within the
United States by threatening or attempting to enforce
foreign censorship laws;

HB0070

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0319
(iii) For example, the United Kingdom's
communications regulatory agency, the Office of
Communications, sent a letter to the United States based
platform 4chan threatening fines of not more than twenty
five million dollars ($25,000,000.00) or ten percent (10%)
of that company's total worldwide revenue for noncompliance
with the United Kingdom's Online Safety Act. In addition,
the Brazilian supreme court Justice Alexandre de Moraes
ordered the United States based platforms X (formerly known
as Twitter) and Trump Media and Technology Group to censor
user accounts and disclose user data or the Brazilian
supreme court may order the shutdown of the platforms and
impose significant penalties;

(iv) These extraterritorial efforts taken by
foreign states and international organizations conflict
with the United States constitution and the Wyoming
constitution by chilling the speech of Wyoming residents,
including residents who operate in digital innovation
sectors like blockchain and decentralized technologies;

(v) Wyoming has a compelling state interest in
safeguarding the free exchange of ideas and protecting its
HB0070

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0319
citizens and business entities against foreign coercion and
intimidation;

(vi) Censorship by foreign states and
international organizations threatens Wyoming's leadership
in decentralized finance and digital assets;

(vii) In order to effectively deter foreign
states and international organizations from enforcing
foreign censorship laws in Wyoming, there needs to be
meaningful civil remedies and joint and several liability
across foreign states, agencies and instrumentalities of
foreign states, international organizations and foreign
officials. Agencies and instrumentalities of foreign states
and foreign officials may be immune from judgment or
liability while foreign states and international
organizations often maintain assets or commercial
relationships within the United States;

(viii) Foreign censorship laws enforced by
foreign states or international organizations
characteristically restrict expression based on content,
viewpoint or speaker identity in ways that would be
HB0070

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0319
presumptively unconstitutional under the first amendment to
the United States constitution, Article 1, Section 20 of
the Wyoming constitution and Article 1, Section 21 of the
Wyoming constitution;

(ix) It is appropriate to place the burden on
foreign states and international organizations to
demonstrate that the foreign states' or international
organizations' enforcement of foreign censorship laws would
satisfy strict scrutiny rather than requiring Wyoming
residents and business entities to prove the
unconstitutionality of foreign speech restrictions because
these foreign censorship laws are fundamentally
incompatible with the constitutional protections afforded
by the United States and Wyoming constitutions;

(x) Foreign states and international
organizations have increasingly sought to criminalize
constitutionally protected speech by issuing criminal
foreign judgments, arrest warrants and extradition requests
that deprive persons in the United States from lawful
expression that is constitutionally protected in the United
States. The dual criminality requirement in most United
HB0070

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0319
States mutual legal assistance treaties reflects the
principle that the United States should not lend its
sovereign power to enforce foreign judgments that
criminalize conduct that is lawful in the United States.
Wyoming has a compelling state interest in ensuring its
legal infrastructure is not used to circumvent this
principle;

(xi) Foreign states and international
organizations have exploited procedural mechanisms,
including service of process through mutual legal
assistance treaties, upon registered agents and through
private process servers to advance foreign censorship
proceedings against citizens of the United States. Even
ministerial cooperation may result in substantial foreign
penalties for constitutionally protected speech, which
facilitates the clearance of procedural hurdles in the
foreign jurisdiction. Wyoming's registered agent system and
private process servers should not serve as vectors for
foreign censorship proceedings and service of process
effectuated through any means should not result in
recognition of any resulting foreign judgment in this
state;
HB0070

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0319

(xii) This act operates defensively to protect
persons within Wyoming from coercion, rather than
offensively to regulate foreign conduct. Congress has
endorsed this approach through the federal SPEECH Act, 28
U.S.C. §§ 4101–4105, which prohibits recognition of foreign
defamation judgments that are inconsistent with the first
amendment to the United States constitution. This act
extends that principle to the broader category of foreign
censorship, consistent with Wyoming's sovereign authority
to determine which foreign judgments Wyoming's courts will
recognize and enforce;

(xiii) The executive branch of the United States
has not established a comprehensive policy to protect
United States persons from enforcement of foreign
censorship laws by foreign states and international
organizations. This act aims to protect state residents
from enforcement of foreign censorship laws and does not
conflict with any existing federal law or policy;

(xiv) When a foreign state or international
organization transmits an enforcement demand, fine or
HB0070

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0319
threat to a person in Wyoming the tortious act is completed
upon receipt. The harm occurs in Wyoming when the person
receives and understands the communication and experiences
the coercive effect of the communication;

(xv) Wyoming seeks to establish itself as a
welcoming home for digital innovation and digital
infrastructure. Wyoming has a compelling state interest in
protecting digital innovation and digital infrastructure
located within the state, including servers, data centers
and other digital infrastructure from enforcement of
foreign censorship laws;

(xvi) No foreign state or international
organization has legitimate discretion to enforce foreign
censorship laws against persons or speech protected by the
first amendment of the United States constitution. The
suppression of constitutionally protected expression
violates fundamental rights recognized by the United
Nations Universal Declaration of Human Rights, the United
Nations International Covenant on Civil and Political
Rights and the first amendment to the United States
constitution. Foreign state's and international
HB0070

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0319
organization's enforcement of foreign censorship laws is
conduct that falls outside any discretionary function
exception to foreign sovereignty immunity.

Section 2. W.S. 1-44-101 through 1-44-108 are created
to read:

CHAPTER 44
WYOMING GRANITE ACT

1-44-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the
"Wyoming Guaranteeing Rights Against Novel International
Tyranny and Extortion (GRANITE) Act."

1-44-102. Purposes.

(a) The purposes of this chapter are to:

(i) Protect the constitutional rights of Wyoming
residents and business entities from the extraterritorial
application of foreign censorship laws by establishing an
HB0070

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0319
in-state forum, with clear and predictable jurisdictional
rules and effective remedies that are consistent with
federal law;

(ii) Promote Wyoming's economy by fostering a
safe harbor for digital innovation and by ensuring that
foreign threats do not deter investment in Wyoming business
entities.

1-44-103. Definitions.

(a) As used in this chapter:

(i) "Enforce" means to give effect to, carry out
or seek compliance with a foreign censorship law, including
by formal legal process, economic pressure, indirect
coercion through affiliates or intermediaries or any other
means;

(ii) "Foreign censorship law" means any law,
rule, judgment, order, subpoena, administrative action or
formal demand of a foreign state or international
organization that:
HB0070

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0319

(A) Is final, binding and enforceable under
the law of that foreign state or country where the
international organization is headquartered;

(B) Has the primary purpose or a
substantial effect of restricting, penalizing or compelling
disclosure regarding expression, expressive conduct or
expressive association;

(C) Targets expression, expressive conduct
or expressive association based on its content, viewpoint
or speaker identity or compels disclosure that would
reasonably chill that expression, expressive conduct or
expressive association; and

(D) Would be unenforceable in this state
because it conflicts with the protections of the first
amendment of the United States constitution, Article 1,
Section 20 of the Wyoming constitution or Article 1,
Section 21 of the Wyoming constitution.

HB0070

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0319
(iii) "Foreign judgment" means any judgment,
decree, order or similar determination issued by a foreign
state or international organization that is final, binding
and enforceable under the laws of that foreign state or
country where the international organization is
headquartered;

(iv) "Foreign state" means as defined in 28
U.S.C. § 1603(a). "Foreign state" shall include an agency
or instrumentality of a foreign state as defined in 28
U.S.C. § 1603(b);

(v) "International organization" means:

(A) As defined in 22 U.S.C. § 288;

(B) An organization with which the United
States has official relations, including any supranational
organization, intergovernmental organization or
multilateral institution; or

HB0070

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0319
(C) Any member state, organ, agency,
commission, court or instrumentality of an organization
described in subparagraph (A) or (B) of this paragraph.

(vi) "Threaten" means to communicate an intent
to enforce a foreign censorship law, including by sending
or directing any notice, demand, subpoena, request or
similar communication to a person by any medium;

(vii) "United States person" means a person who
is a citizen or permanent resident of the United States or
any business entity organized under the laws of the United
States or any state or territory thereof;

(viii) "United States related revenue" means
gross revenue from the sales of goods, provision of
services or conduct of business operations in or directed
to the United States, as determined under generally
accepted accounting principles, for the most recent twelve
(12) month period ending on the last day of the defendant's
fiscal year preceding the commencement of the cause of
action under W.S. 1-44-104(a). For purposes of this
paragraph, "defendant" shall include the named entity and
HB0070

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0319
any parent, subsidiary or affiliate of the entity under
common control that participated in the relevant
transactions;

(ix) "Wyoming resident" means a natural person
who is domiciled in this state;

(x) "Wyoming business entity" means a business
entity that:

(A) Is incorporated, organized or created
under the laws of this state; or

(B) Has its principal place of business in
this state.

1-44-104. Cause of action; statute of limitations;
construction.

(a) A plaintiff described in W.S. 1-44-105(a) shall
have a cause of action, to the extent permitted by federal
law and subject to subsections (b) and (c) of this section,
against any foreign state, international organization or
HB0070

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0319
any officer, employee or other person thereof acting within
the scope of their official duties who has threatened to
enforce, attempted to enforce or enforced a foreign
censorship law against the plaintiff in a manner that would
violate the first amendment of the United States
constitution, Article 1, Section 20 of the Wyoming
constitution or Article 1, Section 21 of the Wyoming
constitution.

(b) The cause of action under subsection (a) of this
section shall apply only to the extent permitted by federal
law, including the Foreign Sovereign Immunities Act and the
International Organizations Immunities Act and any
applicable headquarters agreement, treaty or executive
order.

(c) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to:

(i) Waive the sovereign immunity of any foreign
state or international organization;

HB0070

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0319
(ii) Limit any exceptions to sovereign immunity
available to the plaintiff under the federal Foreign
Sovereign Immunities Act;

(iii) Limit any right of a defendant to remove
the case from state court to federal court as provided by
federal law;

(iv) Limit any defense available to the
defendant under federal law;

(v) Regulate foreign states or international
organizations or to conflict with the foreign affairs
powers of the United States.

(d) A cause of action brought under subsection (a) of
this section shall be commenced not later than four (4)
years after the latest of the following dates:

(i) The date of a foreign state's or
international organization's threat to enforce, attempt to
enforce or enforcement of a foreign censorship law;

HB0070

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0319
(ii) The date of the last in a series of related
threats, attempts or enforcement actions by a foreign state
or international organization arising from the same
investigation or proceeding;

(iii) The date the plaintiff discovered or
reasonably could have discovered a foreign state's or
international organization's threat to enforce, attempt to
enforce or enforcement of a foreign censorship law.

1-44-105. Standing; jurisdiction; venue; alternative
service of process.

(a) A civil cause of action brought under W.S.
1-44-104(a) may be brought by:

(i) A Wyoming resident;

(ii) A natural person who is physically present
in this state when a foreign state or international
organization threatens to enforce, attempts to enforce or
enforces a foreign censorship law against the natural
HB0070

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0319
person and who was specifically targeted by the foreign
censorship law while physically present in this state;

(iii) A Wyoming business entity; or

(iv) Any United States person whose protected
expression, expressive conduct or expressive association
originates from or is hosted on servers physically located
in this state.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a
Wyoming court may exercise personal jurisdiction over any
foreign state or international organization that threatens
to enforce, attempts to enforce or enforces a foreign
censorship law against a person with standing under
subsection (a) of this section, consistent with the United
States constitution and the Wyoming constitution.

(c) Notwithstanding W.S. 1-5-107, an action initiated
under W.S. 1-44-104(a) may be brought in:

(i) The district court of the county where the
plaintiff resides or is located;
HB0070

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0319

(ii) The district court where the communication
that threatened to enforce, attempted to enforce or
enforced a foreign censorship law was received; or

(iii) The first judicial district court in
Laramie county.

(d) Except as provided by subsection (e) of this
section, upon a motion by the plaintiff, a court may
authorize an alternative method of service of process that
is reasonably calculated to give actual notice to an
international organization, including:

(i) Service by email to email addresses that
were used to transmit the threat to enforce, attempt to
enforce or enforcement of a foreign censorship law;

(ii) Service on the United States counsel of
record for the international organization;

HB0070

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0319
(iii) Service by publishing on a website
maintained by an international organization, if the
international organization is evading notice;

(iv) Any other means of service that is
permitted by law or treaty.

(e) Service of process on:

(i) A foreign state shall comply with 28 U.S.C.
§ 1608;

(ii) An international organization as defined in
22 U.S.C. § 288 shall comply with 28 U.S.C. § 1608 and any
applicable headquarters agreements, treaties and
established procedures for providing service of process.

1-44-106. Presumptions; rebuttal.

(a) A court shall presume that a foreign censorship
law violates the first amendment of the United States
constitution, Article 1, Section 20 of the Wyoming
HB0070

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0319
constitution and Article 1, Section 21 of the Wyoming
constitution.

(b) A defendant may rebut the presumption under
subsection (a) of this section by proving by clear and
convincing evidence that:

(i) The foreign censorship law, on its face and
as applied to the plaintiff's expression, expressive
conduct or expressive association, would satisfy strict
scrutiny under the first amendment to the United States
constitution, Article 1, Section 20 of the Wyoming
constitution and Article 1, Section 21 of the Wyoming
constitution; and

(ii) The threatened enforcement, attempted
enforcement or enforcement of the foreign censorship law
does not burden expression, expressive conduct or
expressive association that is protected under the first
amendment to the United States constitution, Article 1,
Section 20 of the Wyoming constitution and Article 1,
Section 21 of the Wyoming constitution.

HB0070

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0319
1-44-107. Remedies; liability.

(a) Upon proof by a preponderance of the evidence
that a defendant threatened to enforce, attempted to
enforce or enforced a foreign censorship law against a
plaintiff in violation of the first amendment of the United
States constitution, Article 1, Section 20 of the Wyoming
constitution or Article 1, Section 21 of the Wyoming
constitution, the court:

(i) Shall award the prevailing plaintiff:

(A) Actual damages as proven by the
plaintiff or nominal damages if actual damages are not
proven by the plaintiff;

(B) Statutory damages of one million
dollars ($1,000,000.00) per violation, as adjusted for
inflation under subsection (c) of this section or ten
percent (10%) of the defendant's annual United States
related revenue, whichever is greater. Statutory damages
imposed under this subparagraph shall not be less than the
amount of any fine or penalty imposed by a foreign state or
HB0070

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0319
international organization regarding the foreign censorship
law. The amount of the fine or penalty imposed by a foreign
state or international organization under this paragraph
shall be calculated in United States currency;

(C) Reasonable attorney fees and costs.

(ii) May award the prevailing plaintiff
declaratory judgment.

(b) The remedies provided under this section shall be
cumulative and shall be in addition to any other remedies
available at law or in equity. The statutory damages
provided under subparagraph (a)(i)(B) of this section shall
be compensatory damages that are intended to compensate
plaintiffs for harms that are inherently difficult to
quantify, including chilling effects on protected
expression, reputational harm, self-censorship costs and
litigation costs incurred in defending against enforcement
of foreign censorship laws and shall not be punitive
damages.

HB0070

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0319
(c) The court shall adjust any statutory damages
granted under subparagraph (a)(i)(B) of this section for
inflation. The court shall calculate the adjustment for
inflation by multiplying the statutory damages amount of
one million dollars ($1,000,000.00) by the ratio of the
seasonally adjusted M2 money supply value published in the
federal reserve statistical release H.6 for the month of
July 2026 to the seasonally adjusted M2 money supply value
for the month that the cause of action was decided. The
court shall use the most recent M2 money supply values
published by the board of governors of the United States
federal reserve system in the federal reserve statistical
release H.6, seasonally adjusted. If the board of governors
of the United States federal reserve system ceases to
publish the seasonally adjusted M2 money supply data, then
the court shall adjust the statutory damages amount of one
million dollars ($1,000,000.00) by using a reasonably
comparable monetary aggregate or price index published by
the board of governors of the United States federal reserve
system or the federal bureau of labor statistics that
preserves the real value of the statutory damages amount to
the extent practicable.

HB0070

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0319
(d) Except as required by federal law, including the
Foreign Sovereign Immunities Act and the International
Organizations Immunities Act, all defendants liable under
subsection (a) of this section shall be jointly and
severally liable for all damages incurred by the plaintiff.

1-44-108. Nonrecognition of foreign judgements;
noncooperation with foreign judgments and extradition
requests; penalties; cause of action.

(a) Except as provided by federal law and otherwise
provided by this subsection, no court of this state shall
recognize, enforce or give effect to any foreign judgment,
order, subpoena, administrative action, fine, penalty or
similar measure that imposes liability or compels actions
based on expression, expressive conduct or expressive
association that would be protected by the first amendment
of the United States constitution, Article 1, Section 20 of
the Wyoming constitution or Article 1, Section 21 of the
Wyoming constitution. A court may sever and may recognize,
enforce or give effect to any foreign judgment, order,
subpoena, administrative action, fine, penalty or similar
measure that does not impose liability or compel action
HB0070

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0319
based on expression, expressive conduct or expressive
association that would be protected by the first amendment
of the United States constitution, Article 1, Section 20 of
the Wyoming constitution or Article 1, Section 21 of the
Wyoming constitution.

(b) Except as required by federal law, the state, its
political subdivisions and its employees acting within the
scope of their official duties shall not provide assistance
or cooperation in collecting, enforcing or giving effect to
any foreign judgment, order, subpoena, administrative
action, fine, penalty or similar measure that imposes
liability or compels actions based on expression,
expressive conduct or expressive association that would be
protected by the first amendment of the United States
constitution, Article 1, Section 20 of the Wyoming
constitution or Article 1, Section 21 of the Wyoming
constitution.

(c) Any person who knowingly violates subsection (b)
of this section is liable for a civil penalty of not more
than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) for each violation.
HB0070

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0319
This civil penalty may be recovered in any action brought
by the attorney general or district attorney.

(d) The state and its political subdivisions shall
not indemnify or reimburse a person who violated subsection
(b) of this section for a civil penalty imposed under
subsection (c) of this section.

(e) Except as required by federal law, no court of
this state shall recognize, enforce or give effect to any
foreign criminal judgment, conviction, sentence, warrant or
similar order that imposes criminal liability based in
whole or in part on expression, expressive conduct or
expressive association that would be protected by the first
amendment of the United States constitution, Article 1,
Section 20 of the Wyoming constitution or Article 1,
Section 21 of the Wyoming constitution.

(f) Except as required by federal law, the state, its
political subdivisions and its employees acting within the
scope of their official duties shall not:

HB0070

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0319
(i) Arrest, detain or surrender any person
pursuant to a foreign extradition request, international
arrest warrant or similar process when the underlying
offense is based on expression, expressive conduct or
expressive association that would be protected by the first
amendment of the United States constitution, Article 1,
Section 20 of the Wyoming constitution or Article 1,
Section 21 of the Wyoming constitution;

(ii) Provide any other assistance or cooperation
to any foreign state or international organization in
investigating, prosecuting, sanctioning or punishing any
person for expression, expressive conduct or expressive
association that would be protected by the first amendment
of the United States constitution, Article 1, Section 20 of
the Wyoming constitution or Article 1, Section 21 of the
Wyoming constitution;

(iii) Honor or execute a request under a mutual
legal assistance treaty, letters, rogatory or other
international agreement or mechanism if the request seeks
service of process, evidence testimony or any other
assistance in connection with a proceeding based on
HB0070

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0319
expression, expressive conduct or expressive association
that would be protected by the first amendment of the
United States constitution, Article 1, Section 20 of the
Wyoming constitution or Article 1, Section 21 of the
Wyoming constitution.

(g) This section shall apply regardless of the manner
in which service of process was effectuated in a foreign
proceeding.

(h) Any person that is subject or may be subject to a
foreign judgment, order, extradition request or foreign
proceeding that is based on expression, expressive conduct
or expressive association that would be protected by the
first amendment of the United States constitution, Article
1, Section 20 of the Wyoming constitution or Article 1,
Section 21 of the Wyoming constitution may bring a cause of
action against the state, its political subdivisions and
its employees acting within the scope of their official
duties in any court of competent jurisdiction in this state
for:

HB0070

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0319
(i) A declaratory judgment that the foreign
judgement, order, extradition request or proceeding is
unenforceable under this section; or

(ii) Injunctive relief prohibiting any person
from seeking to enforce a foreign judgment, order,
extradition request or proceeding in this state or
prohibiting any person from taking action that is
prohibited by this section.

(j) The state shall waive sovereign immunity for
claims brought under subsection (h) of this section seeking
declaratory or injunctive relief. The waiver under this
subsection shall not extend to claims brought under
subsection (h) of this section against the state for
monetary damages.

(k) If the plaintiff prevails in a civil cause of
action brought under subsection (h) of this section, the
court may:

(i) Award reasonable attorney fees and costs;

HB0070

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0319
(ii) Impose civil penalties as provided by this
section.

(m) The attorney general shall promulgate rules to
provide guidance to state and local law enforcement
regarding implementation of this section, including
procedures for identifying foreign judgments, foreign
criminal judgments, orders, subpoenas, administrative
actions, fines and penalties from foreign states and
international organizations that may impose liability or
compel action based on expression, expressive conduct or
expressive association that would be protected by the first
amendment of the United States constitution, Article 1,
Section 20 of the Wyoming constitution or Article 1,
Section 21 of the Wyoming constitution.

Section 3. W.S. 1-5-107 is amended to read:

1-5-107. Actions against nonresidents and foreign
corporations.

An action, other than one (1) of those mentioned in W.S.
1-5-101 through 1-5-104 and 1-44-104, against a nonresident
HB0070

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0319
of this state or a foreign corporation, whether or not
codefendants reside in Wyoming, may be brought in any
county where the cause of action arose or where the
plaintiff resides.

Section 4. The attorney general shall promulgate all
rules necessary to implement this act.

Section 5.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2026.

(b) Sections 4 and 5 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
HB0070